Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-230
Cities of the metropolitan class; drainage; cleaning out watercourse; special assessments.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 31-229, may, if it finds that natural flow is being obstructed, cause the natural watercourse to be cleaned out. Except as provided in section 31-221, the cost thereof may be levied as a special assessment and apportioned among the property owners specially benefited thereby and collected in the same manner as special assessments are levied and collected.

Laws 1965, c. 156, § 4, p. 503;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 50.